Louisiana, session 2026, HB389.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 51:1260(C)(5)(hh) and (ii) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1260. Major Events Incentive Fund; Major Events Incentive Program
* * *
C. As used in this Section, the following terms have the following meanings:
* * *
(5) "Qualified major event" means any event, and any activities related to or
associated with the event, including but not limited to the following:
* * *
(hh) Any major sport and entertainment event or major concert held in
Louisiana State University's football stadium, Tiger Stadium, as part of the DEATH
VALLEY LIVE stadium series.
(ii) A College Football Playoff home game held in Louisiana State
University's football stadium, Tiger Stadium.
* * *
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1272 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 389